Nevada, session 83, SB247.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 218D of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 6, inclusive,
of this act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 6, inclusive, of this act, unless
the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in
sections 3 and 4 of this act have the meanings ascribed to them in
those sections.
Sec. 3. “Health note” means a nonpartisan policy brief
prepared by the Research Division that analyzes how a bill or joint
resolution may impact the social determinants of health.
Sec. 4. “Social determinants of health” means the
nonmedical factors that influence health outcomes, including,
without limitation, education, environment, employment, housing,
food security and access to health care.
Sec. 5. 1. After a bill or joint resolution is prefiled or
introduced, any legislator may request that the Research Division
prepare a health note for the bill or joint resolution that
determines whether the bill or joint resolution is likely to
disproportionately impact the social determinants of health of any
of the following persons in this State:
(a) Members of any racial or ethnic minority;
(b) Members of a low-income or underserved community;
(c) Senior citizens; or
(d) Children.
2. Upon receipt of a request pursuant to subsection 1, the
Research Division shall prepare a health note for the bill or joint
resolution. A health note shall not contain any information that is
confidential pursuant to federal or state law.
3. Any health note prepared by the Research Division
pursuant to this section shall be posted on the Internet website of
the Legislature.
-
*SB247*

– 3 –
4. Nothing in this section prohibits the Legislature or a
committee thereof from taking action on a bill or joint resolution
before the Research Division completes a health note for a bill or
joint resolution.
Sec. 6. Every agency, board, commission, department,
officer, employee or agent of this State or a political subdivision of
this State shall provide the Research Division such assistance as is
necessary for the Research Division to prepare a health note
required pursuant to section 5 of this act.
Sec. 7. NRS 218F.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218F.150 1. The Director and other officers and employees
of the Legislative Counsel Bureau shall not:
(a) Oppose or urge legislation, except as the duties of the
Director, the Legislative Auditor, the Legislative Counsel, the
General Counsel, the Research Director and the Fiscal Analysts
require them to make recommendations to the Legislature.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, NRS 218D.130,
218D.135, 218D.250 and 353.211, disclose to any person outside
the Legislative Counsel Bureau the nature or content of any matter
entrusted to the Legislative Counsel Bureau, and such matter is
confidential and privileged and is not subject to discovery or
subpoena, unless the person entrusting the matter to the Legislative
Counsel Bureau requests or consents to the disclosure.
2. [The] Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
nature or content of any work produced by the officers and
employees of the Research Division may be disclosed if or to the
extent that the disclosure does not reveal the identity of the person
who requested it or include any matter submitted by the requester
which has not been published or publicly disclosed. Any
information obtained by the Research Division for purposes of
preparing a health note pursuant to section 5 of this act is
confidential and privileged and is not subject to discovery or
subpoena.
3. The nature and content of any work produced by the officers
and employees of the Legal Division and the Fiscal Analysis
Division and any matter entrusted to those officers and employees to
produce such work are confidential and privileged and are not
subject to discovery or subpoena.
4. The provisions of subsections 1, 2 and 3 apply to any matter
or work in any form, including, without limitation, in any oral,
written, audio, visual, digital or electronic form, and such matter or
work includes, without limitation, any communications,
information, answers, advice, opinions, recommendations, drafts,
documents, records, questions, inquiries or requests in any such
form.
-
*SB247*

– 4 –
5. When a statute has been enacted or a resolution adopted, the
Legislative Counsel shall upon request disclose to any person the
state or other jurisdiction from whose law it appears to have been
adopted.
6. The records of the travel expenses of Legislators and officers
and employees of the Legislature and the Legislative Counsel
Bureau are available for public inspection at such reasonable hours
and under such other conditions as the Legislative Commission
prescribes.
Sec. 8. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
H
-
*SB247*